Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202286-1203
Definitions, where found.

For purposes of the Small Wireless Facilities Deployment Act, the definitions in sections 86-1204 to 86-1235 apply.

Laws 2019, LB184, § 3.